Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1182.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 343 RIPARIAN CONTAMINATION AND STRUCTURES Sec. 34301. As used in this part: (a) "Connecting waterway" means the St. Mary's River, the Detroit River, the St. Clair River, or Lake St. Clair. (b) "Riparian property" or "property" means a parcel of property bordering on a Great Lake or connecting waterway. Sec. 34303. (1) Not later than January 1, 2028, the department shall conduct a risk assessment for environmental contamination for all riparian property currently or formerly used for industrial or commercial purposes. In conducting the assessment, the department shall utilize available records and seek the assistance of appropriate public and private entities. (2) The risk assessment must rate each riparian property described in subsection (1) as high-, medium-, or low-risk based on all of the following: (a) Historic uses of the property. (b) Hazardous substances known to have been produced, used, or disposed of on the property. (c) The state of compliance with any obligations pertaining to the property under section 20107a(1). (d) Whether and when the department, any other agency of state, federal, or local government, or an environmental consultant inspected the property and the scope and results of the inspection. (e) Whether the property is being actively monitored. (f) Reasonably foreseeable water levels of the Great Lake or connecting waterway bordering the property. (g) The proximity of any contamination at the property to a water supply intake in the Great Lake or connecting waterway bordering the property. (3) The department shall develop a database of all riparian property described in subsection (1) and the results of the risk assessment for each property and shall post the database on the department's website. (4) At least once every 5 years, the department shall update the risk assessment and database under this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 1183. (b) Senate Bill No. 1184.